North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
2012-57, s. 1, provides: “(a) In order to ensure that there is adequate funding in the Medicaid budget for the 2011-2012 fiscal year, the General Assembly directs the Director of the Budget, in conjunction with the State Controller and other necessary State officials, to effectuate the following extraordinary budget adjustment. To the extent necessary for this purpose, up to ninety-four million dollars ($94,000,000) in funds appropriated to the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account for the 2011-2012 fiscal year and allocated to State agencies and The University of North Carolina shall be transferred to the State Controller, deposited in the appropriate budget code as determined by the State Controller, and used to ensure payment to Medicaid providers for the remainder of the 2011-2012 fiscal year.

“(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies only to funds required to cover the costs of paying Medicaid providers during the 2011-2012 fiscal year. Transfers under this section shall be limited to the amounts actually required to pay providers through the end of the 2011-2012 fiscal year. To the extent that the full amount of any of the funds transferred is not required to pay providers through the end of the 2011-2012 fiscal year, (i) the authority to transfer funds shall immediately lapse with respect to the unneeded portions and unneeded adjustments; and (ii) any excess funds transferred shall be transferred back to the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account for reallocation to State agencies.

“(c) On or before October 1, 2012, the Office of State Budget and Management and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the measures taken pursuant to this section to the Appropriations/Base Budget Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 6.14, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) In recent fiscal years, Medicaid program costs have grown disproportionately more than the remainder of the State budget.

“(2) Addressing large and frequent Medicaid program shortfalls has required the reallocation of funds that could have been used for other purposes.

“(3) To cover an early draw down of Medicaid funds during the 2009-2010 fiscal year, the 2011 General Assembly was required to make an additional one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) available to the Medicaid program.

“(4) To cover a shortfall in the 2011-2012 Medicaid budget, the 2012 Session of the 2011 General Assembly was required to appropriate additional funds for the Medicaid program.

“(5) To ensure that adequate funds are available to cover any potential shortfall in the 2012-2013 Medicaid budget, it is necessary to implement management flexibility reductions across State government.

“(b) In order to provide adequate funds to cover any potential shortfall in the 2012-2013 Medicaid budget while minimizing the impact on State government services, the Director of the Budget shall ensure that cost savings required through the management flexibility reductions in this act are realized so that at least fifty percent (50%) of the cost savings are realized by December 31, 2012.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 6.15, as added by Session Laws
2012-145, s. 1.2, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6.14 of this act and

G.S. 143C-6-4

, and unless otherwise specifically directed in this act or in S.L. 2011-145, additional funds appropriated for the 2012-2013 fiscal year to State agencies as defined by
G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(24) shall not be used to offset management flexibility adjustments enacted in this act or in S.L. 2011-145.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9G, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or any other provision of law, the Department of Health and Human Services shall not, under any circumstances, expend any of the funds appropriated in this act for the 2012-2013 fiscal year for the following purposes until January 1, 2013, pending a determination by the Office of State Budget and Management that there is adequate funding for the Medicaid budget for the 2012-2013 fiscal year:

“(1) Funds appropriated to the Division of Child Development and Early Education pursuant to Section 10.4 of this act for ‘Read NC’ Early Literacy Initiative, Development Officers, and assistance to rural partnerships.

“(2) Funds appropriated to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services for the following:

“a. Additional psychiatric care beds at Broughton Hospital.

“b. Additional local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days available to local management entities or managed care organizations under the State-administered three-way contract pursuant to Section 10.10 of this act.

“(3) Funds appropriated to the Division of Public Health pursuant to Section 10.14(a)(5) of this act for local community health and wellness initiatives.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.38(a)-(d), provides: “(a) There is established in the General Fund the Medicaid Contingency Reserve. The Office of the State Controller shall reserve from funds available in the General Fund the sum of one hundred eighty-six million three hundred seventy-two thousand six hundred seventy-three dollars ($186,372,673) in recurring funds to the Medicaid Contingency Reserve. Funds in the Medicaid Contingency Reserve shall be used only for budget shortfalls in the Medicaid Program that occur during the 2014-2015 fiscal year. These funds shall be available for expenditure only upon an appropriation by act of the General Assembly.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate funds from the Medicaid Contingency Reserve only if:

“(1) The Director of the Budget, after the State Controller has verified that receipts are being used appropriately, has found that additional funds are needed to cover a shortfall in the Medicaid budget for the State fiscal year.

“(2) The Department of Health and Human Services has submitted a State plan amendment to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to delink eligibility for Medicaid from eligibility for State-County Special Assistance, to be effective 90 days after the date of submission of the State plan amendment. At least 45 days prior to submitting that State plan amendment, the Department of Health and Human Services must have submitted a draft of that plan to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and, if the General Assembly was not in session, must have consulted with the Committee on that draft.

“(3) The Director of the Budget has reported immediately to the Fiscal Research Division on the amount of the shortfall found in accordance with subdivision (1) of this subsection. This report shall include an analysis of the causes of the shortfall, such as (i) unanticipated enrollment and mix of enrollment, (ii) unanticipated growth or utilization within particular service areas, (iii) errors in the data or analysis used to project the Medicaid budget, (iv) the failure of the program to achieve budgeted savings, (v) other factors and market trends that have impacted the price of or spending for services, (vi) variations in receipts from prior years or from assumptions used to prepare the Medicaid budget for the current fiscal year, or (vii) other factors. The report shall also include data in an electronic format that is adequate for the Fiscal Research Division to confirm the amount of the shortfall and its causes.

“(c) Effective 90 days after the State plan amendment is submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) or when CMS approves the State plan amendment, whichever occurs later, eligibility for Medicaid coverage is delinked from eligibility for State-County Special Assistance and recipients of State-County Special Assistance no longer automatically qualify for Medicaid coverage solely because of their receipt of State-County Special Assistance.

“(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Governor to carry out his duties under the Constitution.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.9(a), (b), provides: “(a) Funds in the Medicaid Contingency Reserve established by Section 12H.38 of S.L. 2014-100 shall be used only for budget shortfalls in the Medicaid Program. These funds shall be available for expenditure only upon an appropriation by act of the General Assembly. It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate funds from the Medicaid Contingency Reserve only if:

“(1) The Director of the Budget, after the State Controller has verified that receipts are being used appropriately, has found that additional funds are needed to cover a shortfall in the Medicaid budget for the State fiscal year.

“(2) The Director of the Budget has reported immediately to the Fiscal Research Division on the amount of the shortfall found in accordance with subdivision (1) of this subsection. This report shall include an analysis of the causes of the shortfall, such as (i) unanticipated enrollment and mix of enrollment, (ii) unanticipated growth or utilization within particular service areas, (iii) errors in the data or analysis used to project the Medicaid budget, (iv) the failure of the program to achieve budgeted savings, (v) other factors and market trends that have impacted the price of or spending for services, (vi) variations in receipts from prior years or from assumptions used to prepare the Medicaid budget for the current fiscal year, or (vii) other factors. The report shall also include data in an electronic format that is adequate for the Fiscal Research Division to confirm the amount of the shortfall and its causes.

“(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Governor to carry out his duties under the Constitution.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12H.28(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Funds in the Medicaid Contingency Reserve established by Section 12H.38 of S.L. 2014-100 shall be used only for budget shortfalls in the Medicaid Program that occur during the 2015-2016 fiscal year. These funds shall be available for expenditure only upon an appropriation by act of the General Assembly.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate funds from the Medicaid Contingency Reserve only if:

“(1) The Director of the Budget, after the State Controller has verified that receipts are being used appropriately, has found that additional funds are needed to cover a shortfall in the Medicaid budget for the State fiscal year.

“(2) The Director of the Budget has reported immediately to the Fiscal Research Division on the amount of the shortfall found in accordance with subdivision (1) of this subsection. This report shall include an analysis of the causes of the shortfall, such as (i) unanticipated enrollment and mix of enrollment, (ii) unanticipated growth or utilization within particular service areas, (iii) errors in the data or analysis used to project the Medicaid budget, (iv) the failure of the program to achieve budgeted savings, (v) other factors and market trends that have impacted the price of or spending for services, (vi) variations in receipts from prior years or from assumptions used to prepare the Medicaid budget for the current fiscal year, or (vii) other factors. The report shall also include data in an electronic format that is adequate for the Fiscal Research Division to confirm the amount of the shortfall and its causes.

“(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Governor to carry out his duties under the Constitution.”

Session Laws
2013-5, s. 3, provides: “The State will not expand the State’s Medicaid eligibility under the Medicaid expansion provided in the Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended, for which the enforcement was ruled unconstitutional by the
U.S. Supreme Court in
National Federation of Independent Business, et al. v. Sebelius, Secretary of Health and Human Services, et al.,
132 S. Ct. 2566 (2012). No department, agency, or institution of this State shall attempt to expand the Medicaid eligibility standards provided in S.L. 2011-145, as amended, or elsewhere in State law, unless directed to do so by the General Assembly.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9F(c), as amended by Session Laws
2012-194, s. 70 and Session Laws
2013-306, s. 1, provides: “A Medicaid recipient who meets each of the following criteria is eligible for up to 80 hours of personal care services:

“(1) The recipient has a medical condition, disability, or cognitive impairment and demonstrates unmet needs for, at a minimum, (i) three of the five qualifying activities of daily living (ADLs) with limited hands-on assistance; (ii) two ADLs, one of which requires extensive assistance; or (iii) two ADLs, one of which requires assistance at the full dependence level.

“(2) The recipient (i) resides in a private living arrangement, a residential facility licensed by the State of North Carolina as an adult care home, or a combination home as defined in
G.S. 131E-101(1a); or (ii) resides in a group home licensed under Chapter 122C or the General Statutes and under
10A NCAC 27G.5601 as a supervised living facility for two or more adults whose primary diagnosis is mental illness, a developmental disability, or substance abuse dependency, and is eligible to receive personal care services under the Medicaid State Plan.

“The five qualifying ADLs are eating, dressing, bathing, toileting, and mobility. For Medicaid recipients meeting the criteria above, personal care services shall be available in accordance with an assessment conducted under subsection (d) of this section and a plan of care developed by the service provider and approved by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, or its designee.

“(3) A Medicaid recipient who meets the eligibility criteria provided in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection and all of the criteria provided below is eligible for up to 50 additional hours of Medicaid Personal Care Services per month for a total of up to 130 hours per month in accordance with an assessment and a plan of care.

“a. The recipient requires an increased level of supervision.

“b. The recipient requires caregivers with training or experience in caring for individuals who have a degenerative disease, characterized by irreversible memory dysfunction, that attacks the brain and results in impaired memory, thinking, and behavior, including gradual memory loss, impaired judgment, disorientation, personality change, difficulty in learning, and the loss of language skills.

“c. Regardless of setting, the recipient requires a physical environment that includes modifications and safety measures to safeguard the recipient because of the recipient’s gradual memory loss, impaired judgment, disorientation, personality change, difficulty in learning, and the loss of language skills.

“d. The recipient has a history of safety concerns related to inappropriate wandering, ingestion, aggressive behavior, and an increased incidence of falls.

“Physician attestation. — A recipient must have a physician’s attestation that the recipient meets each of the criteria in sub-subdivisions a. through d. of subdivision 3 of this subsection. A recipient is not required to have a new attestation if he or she is identified by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, as having on record a physician’s attestation that meets the requirements of this subdivision. A recipient is required to have a new attestation if one cannot be identified by the Division of Medical Assistance or if the one identified does not meet the requirements of this subdivision.

“Independent assessment. — Based on the physician’s attestation, the Medicaid recipient must receive an independent assessment conducted by a trained professional who is qualified to assess and has experience assessing individuals with the needs for additional safeguards identified by this subdivision. The independent assessment shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (d) of this section and shall determine the number of hours of personal care services needed by the individual. In response to the assessment, a plan of care shall be developed by the service provider and approved by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, or its designee.

“Personal care services shall not include nonmedical transportation; financial management; non-hands-on assistance such as cueing, prompting, guiding, coaching, or babysitting; and household chores not directly related to the qualifying ADLs.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9F(d), as amended by Session Laws
2012-194, s. 70 and Session Laws
2013-306, s. 1, provides: “All assessments for personal care services, continuation of service, and change of status reviews shall be performed by an independent assessment entity (IAE). The IAE shall not be an owner of a provider business or provider of personal care services of any type.

“A recipient shall be assessed by the IAE after the recipient’s primary or attending physician provides written authorization for referral for the service and written attestation to the medical necessity for the service. The IAE shall determine and authorize the amount of service to be provided as determined by its review and findings of each recipient’s degree of functional disability and level of unmet needs for personal care services in the five qualifying ADLs.”

Session Laws
2013-306, s. 2, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall reduce the rate for personal care services in order to fund the additional service hours authorized in Section 1 of this act and in order to remain within the budgeted amount of funds for personal care services.”

Session Laws
2013-306, s. 3, provides: “On or before August 15, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services a Medicaid State Plan Amendment necessary to implement this act. The State Plan Amendment shall include an effective date of July 1, 2013, or as soon after July 1, 2013, as allowed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

Session Laws
2013-306, s. 4(a), provides: “On or before August 1, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall make an interim report on the implementation of this act to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and to the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following: (i) an estimate of the number of Medicaid recipients that would be eligible for Medicaid Personal Care Services under this act, (ii) an estimate of the number of PCS hours potential recipients would need broken out in increments of 10 hours between 80 and 130 hours, (iii) a copy of the draft Medicaid State Plan Amendment (SPA), (iv) an estimated time line for approval of the SPA and a projected implementation date, and (v) the rate reductions necessary to implement this act.”

Session Laws
2013-306, s. 4(b). provides: “On or before November 1, 2013, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the implementation of this act to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12H.1(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, (Department), in consultation with the Medicaid Reform Advisory Group created by subsection (e) of this section, shall create a detailed plan for, but not implement, significant reforms to the State’s Medicaid Program that shall accomplish the following:

“(1) Create a predictable and sustainable Medicaid program for North Carolina taxpayers.

“(2) Increase administrative ease and efficiency for North Carolina Medicaid providers.

“(3) Provide care for the whole person by uniting physical and behavioral health care.

“(b) The Department shall submit its detailed proposal of how to reform the State’s Medicaid Program to the General Assembly. The report shall contain the following:

“(1) The details of the reform plan, including how the plan would accomplish the goals set out in subsection (a) of this section.

“(2) The Department’s methodology for selecting the reform plan over alternatives.

“(3) Forecasts of the reform plan’s potential to slow the growth of the costs of the Medicaid Program, including the assumptions and methodology used for the forecast, as well as an explanation of how the Department’s forecast methodology has been improved to produce more accurate forecasting than in prior years.

“(4) The reform plan’s impact, as compared to the existing Medicaid Program, on both providers and recipients in areas such as enrollment within the Medicaid system, access to services, quality of care, and payment methodologies, and any other areas of comparison to help the General Assembly evaluate the reform plan.

“(5) If regional demonstration projects, pilot projects, or similar projects will be used to test a proposal, how the Department will ensure that the test methodology is scientifically valid and consistent with social science research methods.

“(6) How financial risks will be allocated under the reform plan.

“(7) The mechanisms through which the Department and any contractors under the reform plan would be held accountable for the implementation and performance of the plan.

“(8) Short-term costs to implement the plan and expected long-term savings in future years from slowing the growth of costs.

“(9) A realistic time line for implementation.

“(10) Draft Medicaid State Plan Amendments, Medicaid waivers, amendments to State law, or other changes necessary to legally allow the Department to implement its reform plan.

“(11) Any other detailed information that would assist the General Assembly in evaluating the strength of the reform plan and the plan’s ability to accomplish the goals set out in subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) The Department is encouraged to and may submit draft Medicaid State Plan amendments, draft waiver applications, or other documents to the federal government to solicit feedback on the Department’s proposal prior to reporting to the General Assembly. The Department shall not, however, submit any documents to the federal government to implement the reform plan without legislation authorizing the Department to implement the Department’s reform plan.

“(d) The Department shall submit its reform plan to the General Assembly no later than March 17, 2014, but is encouraged to submit its plan as early as it responsibly can.

“(e) Advisory Group. — There is established the North Carolina Medicaid Reform Advisory Group (Advisory Group) in order to advise the Department of Health and Human Services in its development of its detailed plan to reform Medicaid. The Advisory Group shall meet in order to (i) provide stakeholder input in a public forum and (ii) ensure the transparency of the process of developing the reform proposal. The Advisory Group shall meet at the call of the chair.

“The Advisory Group shall consist of the following five members, and the appointing officer shall fill vacancies:

“(1) A Representative appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(2) A Senator appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

“(3) Three persons appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be designated as the chair.

“Legislative members of the Advisory Group shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. Non-legislative members of the Advisory Group shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses as allowed under

G.S. 138-5

or, if the member is a State employee, lodging and travel expenses as allowed under

G.S. 138-6

.

“The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall ensure adequate staff representation and support from the Department of Health and Human Services.

“The Advisory Group shall terminate on July 1, 2014.

“(f) Eligibility of Legislation. — Legislation based on the Department’s reform proposal and recommended by the Advisory Group shall be eligible for consideration when the 2013 General Assembly reconvenes in 2014, and

G.S. 143C-5-2

does not apply to such legislation.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12F.4A(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11F.16, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall require local management entities, including local management entities that have been approved to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver (LME/MCOs), to implement clinical integration activities with Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) through Total Care, a collaborative initiative designed to improve and minimize the cost of care for patients who suffer from comorbid mental health or substance abuse and primary care or other chronic conditions.

“(b) The Department shall ensure that, by no later than January 1, 2014, all LME/MCOs submit claims data, including to the extent practical, retrospective claims data and integrated payment and reporting system (IPRS) data, to the CCNC Informatics Center and to the Medicaid Management Information System. Upon receipt of this claims data, CCNC shall provide access to clinical data and care management information within the CCNC Informatics Center to LME/MCOs and authorized behavioral health providers to support (i) treatment, quality assessment, and improvement activities or (ii) coordination of appropriate and effective patient care, treatment, or habilitation.

“(c) The Department, in consultation with CCNC and the LME/MCOs, shall develop quality and performance statistics on the status of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, including, but not limited to, variations in total cost of care, clinical outcomes, and access to and utilization of services.

“(d) The Department shall, within available appropriations and as deemed necessary by the Department, expand or alter existing contracts by mutual agreement of all parties to the contract in order to implement the provisions of this section.

(e) Repealed by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11F.16, effective July 1, 2017.

Session Laws
2013-363, s. 12H.3(b), provides: “The Department shall not take any actions that the Department determines would jeopardize the State’s qualification to receive federal funds through the Medicaid Program.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12H.21(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Office of the State Auditor shall, as recommended in its January 2013 performance audit of the Medicaid Program, engage nationally recognized medical researchers to perform a scientifically valid study based upon actual data to determine whether the Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) model saves money and improves health outcomes. This study shall begin during fiscal year 2013-2014 and shall, if possible, be completed by the end of that fiscal year. The Department of Health and Human Services shall, upon the direction of and in amounts specified by the Office of the State Auditor, make payments to the contractor hired by the Office of the State Auditor from the one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) appropriated elsewhere in this budget for this study as well as from federal Medicaid matching funds available for this study.

“(b) North Carolina Community Care Networks, Inc. (NCCCN), shall report quarterly to the Department and to the Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) on the development of the statewide Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables as agreed upon in the contract. NCCCN shall submit biannual reports to the Secretary of Health and Human Services, OSBM, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the progress and results of implementing the quantitative, analytical, utilization, quality, cost containment, and access goals and deliverables set out in the contract. NCCCN shall conduct its own analysis of the CCNC system to identify any variations from the development plan for the Enhanced Primary Care Case Management System and its defined goals and deliverables set out in the contract between the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance (DMA), and NCCCN. Upon identifying any variations, NCCCN shall develop and implement a plan to address the variations. NCCCN shall report the plan to DMA within 30 days after taking any action to implement the plan.”

Session Laws
2013-363, s. 12H.3(b) provides: “The Department shall not take any actions that the Department determines would jeopardize the State’s qualification to receive federal funds through the Medicaid Program.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12H.22(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall contract with Community Care Networks, Inc. (NCCCN), to administer and distribute the funds currently allocated to per member per month (PMPM) payments for Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) primary care providers. NCCCN shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the funds allocated to PMPM payments to primary care providers on a care management performance basis using criteria developed by NCCCN. In developing its pay for performance model, NCCCN shall (i) ensure an adequate statewide network of participating CCNC primary care providers and (ii) adopt a payment level of zero dollars ($0.00) for providers who do not satisfactorily participate in CCNC care management initiatives. Performance-based payments shall begin on July 1, 2014.

“(b) PMPM payments from the Department to CCNC primary care providers shall continue until the implementation of the performance-based payment system.

“(c) The Department shall consult with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the performance-based payment proposal from NCCCN to incentivize better care management from primary care providers. If the Department submits a report and requests a meeting for the consultation, but the Oversight Committee does not hear the consultation within 90 days of the request, then the consultation requirement shall be deemed waived by the Oversight Committee. The report submitted for consultation shall include the following:

“(1) Measureable elements that will be used to differentiate care management performance-based payments from the existing PMPM payments.

“(2) A comparison of the performance plan to other measures such as the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) or other national performance or quality measures.

“(3) The specific structure of when payments would be made.

“(4) An impact calculation of prospective payments under the performance-based payment plan and the current PMPM rates.

“(d) Subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon both of the following:

“(1) The Department’s successful renegotiation of and modification to the existing contract or entering into a new contract with NCCCN to administer and distribute performance-based payments, as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

“(2) The consultation required under subsection (c) of this section or an implied waiver of the consultation requirement, as provided in subsection (c) of this section.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.19, effective July 1, 2014, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that the structure of per member per month (PMPM) payments or other payments to providers participating in Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) programs be considered as a part of any Medicaid reform plan for the State. Therefore, Section 12H.22 of S.L. 2013-360 is repealed.”

Session Laws
2015-245, ss. 1-9A, as amended by Session Laws,
2016-121, s. 2(a)-(e1), Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.17(a), Session Laws
2017-186, s. 4, Session Laws
2018-5, s. 11H.10(c), (d), Session Laws
2018-48, s. 1, Session Laws
2018-49, ss. 4-7, Session Laws
2019-81, s. 12-14, and Session Laws
2020-88, s. 7(a), provides: “Section 1. Codified as

G.S. 108D-30

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(1), effective October 1, 2019.

“Section 2. Role of the General Assembly. — The General Assembly shall have the following roles and responsibilities in Medicaid and NC Health Choice transformation and governance:

“(1) Define the overall goals of transformation and the structure of the delivery system for the programs.

“(2) Monitor the development of transformation plans and implementation through the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice.

“(3) Define and approve eligibility categories, resource limits, and income thresholds for the programs, including which populations will be covered by Prepaid Health Plans (PHPs).

“(4) Appropriate the annual budget for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

“(5) Confirm the Director of the Division of Health Benefits, as required by

G.S. 143B-216.85

, enacted by Section 12 of this act.

“Section 3. Time Line for Medicaid Transformation. — The following milestones for Medicaid transformation shall occur no later than the following dates:

“(1) When this act becomes law. —

“a. The Division of Health Benefits of the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) is created pursuant to Section 10 of this act.

“b. The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice is created pursuant to Section 15 of this act to oversee the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

“c. DHHS shall begin development of the 1115 waiver and any other State Plan amendments and waiver amendments necessary to effectuate the Medicaid transformation required by this act.

“(2) March 1, 2016. — DHHS shall report its plans and progress on Medicaid transformation, including recommended statutory changes, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, as required by subdivision (12) of Section 5 of this act.

“(3) On or before June 1, 2016. — DHHS shall submit the waivers and State Plan amendments required by this act to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS).

“Not later than July 1, 2021. — Capitated contracts shall begin. DHHS may phase recipient enrollment on a regional basis, provided that initial recipient enrollment shall be complete no later than five months after the date capitated contracts begin.

“Section 4. Structure of Delivery System. — The transformed Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs described in Section 1 of this act [now

G.S. 108D-30

] shall be organized according to the following principles and parameters:

“(1) DHHS authority. — The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall have full authority to manage the State’s Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs provided that the total expenditures, net of agency receipts, do not exceed the authorized budget for each program, except the General Assembly shall determine eligibility categories, resource limits, and income thresholds. DHHS shall be responsible for planning and implementing the Medicaid transformation required by this act.

“(2) Prepaid Health Plan. — For purposes of this act, a Prepaid Health Plan (PHP) shall be defined as an entity, which may be a commercial plan or provider-led entity, that operates or will operate a capitated contract for the delivery of services pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section, or a local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) that operates or will operate a BH IDD Tailored Plan pursuant to subdivision (10) of this section [now

G.S. 108D-60

]. For purposes of this act, the terms “commercial plan” and “provider-led entity” are defined as follows:

“a. Commercial plan or CP. — Any person, entity, or organization, profit or nonprofit, that undertakes to provide or arrange for the delivery of health care services to enrollees on a prepaid basis except for enrollee responsibility for copayments and deductibles and holds a PHP license issued by the Department of Insurance.

“b. Provider-led entity or PLE. — An entity that meets all of the following criteria:

“1. A majority of the entity’s ownership is held by an individual or entity that has as its primary business purpose the ownership or operation of one or more capitated contracts described in subdivision (3) of this section or Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers.

“2. A majority of the entity’s governing body is composed of individuals who (i) are licensed in the State as physicians, physician assistants, nurse practitioners, or psychologists and (ii) have experience treating beneficiaries of the North Carolina Medicaid program.

“3. Holds a PHP license issued by the Department of Insurance.

“(3) Capitated contracts. — The Division of Health Benefits, created in Section 10 of this act, shall enter into capitated contracts with PHPs for the delivery of Medicaid and NC Health Choice services as specified in this act. All capitated contracts shall be the result of requests for proposals (RFPs) issued by the Division of Health Benefits and the submission of competitive bids by PHPs, pursuant to subdivision (6) of Section 5 of this act [Most of subdivision (6) was codified as
G.S.108D-65].

“(4) Codified as

G.S. 108D-35

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(2), effective October 1, 2019.

“(5) Codified as

G.S. 108D-40(a)

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(3), effective October 1, 2019.

“(5a) Codified as

G.S. 108D-40(b)

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(4), effective October 1, 2019.

“(6) Codified as

G.S. 108D-45

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(5), effective October 1, 2019.

“(6a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, and the Department of Insurance shall jointly review the applicability of provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes to PHPs, and report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice by March 1, 2016, on the following:

“a. Proposed exceptions to the applicability of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes for PHPs.

“b. Recommendations for resolving conflicts between Chapter 58 of the General Statutes and the requirements of Medicaid federal law and regulations.

“c. Proposed statutory changes necessary to implement this subdivision.

“(7) Codified as

G.S. 108D-50

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(6), effective October 1, 2019.

“(8) Codified as

G.S. 108D-55

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(7), effective October 1, 2019.

“(9) Codified as
G.S. 122C-115(e) by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(8), effective October 1, 2019.

“(10) [Portions of this subdivision were codified as

G.S. 108D-60

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(9), effective October 1, 2019] BH IDD Tailored Plans. - DHHS shall not begin any application process to implement, establish rules for, or begin any contracting or procurement process with respect to BH IDD Tailored Plans, as defined in this subdivision, until August 31, 2018, or until authorized to do so in a subsequent act of the General Assembly, whichever comes first. BH IDD Tailored Plans shall be defined as capitated PHP contracts that meet all requirements in this act pertaining to capitated PHP contracts, except as specifically provided in this subdivision. Capitated PHP contracts that are not BH IDD Tailored Plans shall be referred to as Standard Benefit Plans. With regard to BH IDD Tailored Plans, the following shall occur:

“a. DHHS shall create a detailed plan for implementation of BH IDD Tailored Plans under the 1115 Waiver in accordance with the following requirements:

“1. In the event of the discontinuation of the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers, the following essential components of the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers shall be included in the 1115 Waiver:
